Tennessee, session 114, HB1820.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-10-102(a)(1), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision:
(F) If elected or appointed to the office of constable on or after August 1, 2030,
have graduated from a Tennessee POST-approved certified law enforcement training
academy; provided, however, that this subdivision (a)(1)(F) does not apply to a person
who has held the office of constable for one (1) complete term and is reelected to the
office of constable on or after August 1, 2030.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1820
011903
- 1 -